Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB112.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "new motor vehicle" in section 2 of the act of March 28, 1984 (P.L.150, No.28), known as the Automobile Lemon Law, amended November 18, 2024 (P.L.1205, No.151), is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Farm equipment." A new and unused vehicle that is specifically designed and manufactured for and used exclusively 123456789101112131415161718 in agriculture to plant, seed, cultivate, harvest or apply soil nutrients, fertilizers or chemicals, which was purchased or leased and is registered in this Commonwealth or purchased or leased elsewhere and registered for the first time in this Commonwealth.* * *"New motor vehicle."(1) Any of the following:(i) Any new and unused self-propelled, motorized conveyance driven upon public roads, streets or highways which is designed to transport not more than 15 persons, which was purchased or leased and is registered in the Commonwealth or purchased or leased elsewhere and registered for the first time in the Commonwealth and is used, leased or bought for use primarily for personal, family or household purposes, including a vehicle used by a manufacturer or dealer as a demonstrator or dealer car prior to its sale.(ii) Farm equipment.(2) The term includes motorcycles and does not include motor homes, off-road vehicles or dual sport motorcycles driven off road[.] that are not farm equipment.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0112PN0090 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324